tr: VESA montaj deseni: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Diğer
sv: VESA-monteringsmönster: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Övrigt
nl: VESA-montagepatroon: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Andere
hu: VESA-rögzítési minta: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Egyéb
th: รูปแบบการติดตั้ง VESA: 100 x 100 มม.; 100 x 200 มม.; 200 x 100 มม.; 200 x 200 มม.; 300 x 300 มม.; 400 x 200 มม.; 400 x 400 มม.; 600 x 400 มม.; 75 x 75 มม.; อื่นๆ
fr: Modèle de montage VESA: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Autre
zh-TW: VESA 安裝樣式: 100 x 100 公釐; 100 x 200 公釐; 200 x 100 公釐; 200 x 200 公釐; 300 x 300 公釐; 400 x 200 公釐; 400 x 400 公釐; 600 x 400 公釐; 75 x 75 公釐; 其他
de: VESA-Montagemuster: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Sonstiges
it: Schema di montaggio VESA: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Altro
pt-PT: Padrão de montagem VESA: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Outro
da: VESA-monteringsmønster: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Andet
ru: Схема крепления VESA: 100 x 100 мм; 100 x 200 мм; 200 x 100 мм; 200 x 200 мм; 300 x 300 мм; 400 x 200 мм; 400 x 400 мм; 600 x 400 мм; 75 x 75 мм; Другой
ko: VESA 마운팅 패턴: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; 기타
el: Πρότυπο στήριξης VESA: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Άλλο
es: Patrón de montaje VESA: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Otros
sl-SI: Vzorec pritrditve VESA: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Drugo
pt-BR: Padrão de montagem VESA: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Outro
en: VESA mounting pattern: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Other
hr-HR: VESA uzorak montiranja: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Ostalo
zh-CN: VESA 安装模式: 100 x 100 毫米; 100 x 200 毫米; 200 x 100 毫米; 200 x 200 毫米; 300 x 300 毫米; 400 x 200 毫米; 400 x 400 毫米; 600 x 400 毫米; 75 x 75 毫米; 其他
lt-LT: VESA tvirtinimo šablonas: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Kita
bg-BG: VESA монтажен шаблон: 100 x 100 мм; 100 x 200 мм; 200 x 100 мм; 200 x 200 мм; 300 x 300 мм; 400 x 200 мм; 400 x 400 мм; 600 x 400 мм; 75 x 75 мм; Други
pl: Wzór montażu VESA: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Inne
vi: Mẫu lắp đặt VESA: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Khác
ja: VESAマウントパターン: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; その他
nb: VESA-monteringsmønster: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Annet
cs: VESA montážní vzor: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Jiné
sk-SK: Montážny vzor VESA: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Iné
fi: VESA-kiinnityskuvio: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Muu
ro-RO: Model de montare VESA: 100 x 100 mm; 100 x 200 mm; 200 x 100 mm; 200 x 200 mm; 300 x 300 mm; 400 x 200 mm; 400 x 400 mm; 600 x 400 mm; 75 x 75 mm; Altele